Hawaii statutes.
§142-48 Felonious branding; penalty.
Whoever wilfully and feloniously brands, or otherwise marks, any kine, horse,
mule, sheep, goat, or other cattle belonging to another, with one's mark, or
with the mark of another not the owner of the animal so branded or marked, with
the intent to convert it to one's own use, or to the use of another shall be
imprisoned not more than one year, or fined not more than $200 for each kine,
horse, mule, sheep, goat or other cattle thus branded or marked. [PC 1869, c
25, §1; am L 1903, c 12, §1; RL 1925, §688; RL 1935, §266; RL 1945, §1075; RL
1955, §20-47; HRS §142-48; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Brand of itself not
conclusive evidence of ownership; law regulating brands does not apply to wild
herds roaming Maunakea. 2 H. 367.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next